src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun 

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;
Possessive;

LEXICON Personal
mi Possessive; !'1st person singular'
ci Possessive; !'2nd person singular archaic'
li Possessive; !'3rd person singular male'
ŝi Possessive; !'3rd person singular female'
ĝi Possessive; !'3rd person singular neuter'
ni Possessive; !'1st person plural' 
vi Possessive; !'2nd person singular/plural'
ili Possessive; !'3rd person plural'
si Possessive; !'reflexive'
oni Possessive; !'general? Like "one" or 3rd singular "they"'

LEXICON Possessive
+Possessive:a Number;
+NonPossessive: Number;

LEXICON Number
+Sing: Case; !Singular
+Plu:j Case; !Plural

LEXICON Case
+Nom:    #; !Nominative
+Acc:n   #; !Accusative

LEXICON Demonstrative
K ;

LEXICON Reflexive
K ;
